Washington statutes.
RCW 35.92.060

Authority to acquire and operate transportation facilities.

A city or town may also construct, condemn and purchase, purchase, acquire, add to, alter, maintain, operate, or lease cable, electric, and other railways, automobiles, motor cars, motor buses, auto trucks, and any and all other forms or methods of transportation of freight or passengers within the corporate limits of the city or town, and a first-class city may also construct, purchase, acquire, add to, alter, maintain, operate, or lease cable, electric, and other railways beyond those corporate limits only within the boundaries of the county in which the city is located and of any adjoining county, for the transportation of freight and passengers above, upon, or underneath the ground. It may also fix, alter, regulate, and control the fares and rates to be charged therefor; and fares or rates may be adjusted or eliminated for any distinguishable class of users including, but not limited to, senior citizens, persons with disabilities, and students. Without the payment of any license fee or tax, or the filing of a bond with, or the securing of a permit from, the state, or any department thereof, the city or town may engage in, carry on, and operate the business of transporting and carrying passengers or freight for hire by any method or combination of methods that the legislative authority of any city or town may by ordinance provide, with full authority to regulate and control the use and operation of vehicles or other agencies of transportation used for such business.

[ 2020 c 274 s 15; 1995 c 42 s 1; 1991 c 124 s 1; 1990 c 43 s 49; 1985 c 445 s 10; 1981 c 25 s 2; 1965 c 7 s 35.92.060. Prior: 1957 c 288 s 7; 1957 c 209 s 7; prior: 1947 c 214 s 1, part; 1933 c 163 s 1, part; 1931 c 53 s 1, part; 1923 c 173 s 1, part; 1913 c 45 s 1, part; 1909 c 150 s 1, part; 1899 c 128 s 1, part; 1897 c 112 s 1, part; 1893 c 8 s 1, part; 1890 p 520 s 1, part; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 9488, part. Formerly RCW 80.40.060.]

NOTES:

Construction—Severability—Headings—1990 c 43: See notes following RCW 81.100.010.

Additional sales and use taxes: RCW 82.14.045.

Public transportation systems, financing, purchase of leased systems: Chapter 35.95 RCW.